Tennessee, session 114, HB2138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated Title 67, Chapter 9, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
67-9-104.
Of the amount of Tennessee Valley authority payments in lieu of taxes paid to or
retained by the state under § 67-9-101(a)(1), ten percent (10%) must be allocated to the
wildlife resources fund established in § 70-1-401 and used for purposes set forth in title
69, chapter 9, and title 70.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2138
012300
- 1 -